Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2918
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2901 to 44-2918 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Hospital and Physicians Mutual Insurance Association Act.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 18.